apertium-nog.nog.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!    M O R P H O L O G I C A L · T R A N S D U C E R · F O R · N O G A Y    !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! See https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Turkic_lexicon

Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                     ! 
%<v%>                     ! 
%<np%>                    ! 
%<ij%>                    ! 
%<num%>                   ! 
%<adj%>                   ! 
%<cop%>                   ! 
%<det%>                   ! 
%<prn%>                   ! 
%<adv%>                   ! 
%<post%>                  ! 
%<vaux%>                  ! 
%<postadv%>               ! 
%<cnjsub%>                ! 
%<cnjcoo%>                ! 
%<cnjadv%>                ! 
%<emph%>                  ! 

%<attr%>                  ! 
%<subst%>                 ! 
%<advl%>                  ! 

%<top%>                   ! 
%<ant%>                   ! 
%<pers%>                  ! 

%<ind%>                   ! 
%<dem%>                   ! 
%<recip%>                 ! 
%<itg%>                   ! 
%<qnt%>                   ! 
%<ord%>                   ! 
%<ref%>                   ! 

%<m%>                     ! 
%<f%>                     ! 
%<mf%>                    ! 

%<sg%>                    ! 
%<pl%>                    ! 

%<p1%>                    ! 
%<p2%>                    ! 
%<p3%>                    ! 

%<px1sg%>                 ! 
%<px2sg%>                 ! 
%<px3sp%>                 ! 
%<px1pl%>                 ! 
%<px2pl%>                 ! 
%<px3pl%>                 ! 

%<nom%>                   ! 
%<gen%>                   ! 
%<dat%>                   ! 
%<acc%>                   ! 
%<loc%>                   ! 
%<abl%>                   ! 

%<abe%>                   ! 
%<sim%>                   ! 

%<iv%>                    ! 
%<tv%>                    ! 

%<pass%>                  ! 
%<coop%>                  ! 
%<caus%>                  ! 

%<neg%>                   ! 

%<fut%>                   ! 
%<aor%>                   ! 
%<past%>                  ! 
%<ifi%>                   ! 
%<imp%>                   ! 
%<opt%>                   ! 

%<ger%>                   ! 
%<ger1%>                  ! 
%<ger_past%>              ! 
%<ger_pros%>              ! 
%<ger_impf%>              ! 

%<prc_perf%>              ! 
%<prc_impf%>              ! 
%<prc_cond%>              ! 
%<prc_vol%>               ! 

%<gna_perf%>              ! 
%<gna_cond%>              ! 

%<gpr_past%>              ! 
%<gpr_perf%>              ! 
%<gpr_impf%>              ! 

! Punctuation
%<sent%>                  ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>                  ! Hyphen
%<cm%>                    ! Comma
%<apos%>                  ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>                 ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>                 ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>                  ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>                  ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

! Archiphonemes and escaped symbols
%{A%}                     ! 'а' или 'е' 
%{I%}                     ! 'ы' или 'и'
%{G%}                     ! 'к' или 'г'
%{D%}                     ! 'т', 'н', или 'д'
%{Я%}                     ! 'я', или 'е'
%{M%}                     ! 'п', 'м', или 'б'
%{L%}                     ! 'л' или 'н'
%{n%}                     
%{s%}
%{y%}                     ! '' or '{I}'; only used in epenthesis for nouns

%{u%}
%{ь%}
%{l%}
%{e%}                     ! forces front VH
%{❗%}
%{☭%}                     ! Russian noun (final voiced Cns treated as unvoiced)
%{E%}

%> 
% 
%+
%~
%-

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 
Postpositions ; 
Miscellaneous ; 
Numerals ; 
Determiners ; 
Interjections ;
Pronouns ; 
Conjunctions ; 
Adverbs ; 
Adjectives ; 
ProperNouns ; 
Verbs ; 
Copula ;
Punctuation ; 
Postadverbs ;

LEXICON CLIT 

# ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP

!%+э%<cop%>: V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
!%+э%<cop%>: V-PERS-S1 ;
!э%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:экен POSS ;


# ; 

LEXICON CLIT-QST

!%+ма%<qst%>:%>% %{M%}%{A%} # ;
# ; 

LEXICON CLIT-INCL-COP

CLIT-QST ; 
CLIT-COP ; 
CLIT ; 

LEXICON CASES-OBL

%<gen%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}нъ CLIT ; 
%<acc%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} CLIT ; 
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ; 
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-INCL-COP ; 
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT-INCL-COP ; 

LEXICON CASES 

%<nom%>: CLIT-INCL-COP ; 
CASES-OBL ; 

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON POSS

CASES-ETC ; 
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}нъ CASES-ETC ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASES-ETC ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}нъ%{I%}з CASES-ETC ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; 

LEXICON ABESS-INFL

!%<attr%>: CLIT ; 
!%<advl%>: CLIT ; 
CLIT ; 
%<subst%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON ABESS

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з ABESS-INFL ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS ;
CASES-ETC ;
ABESS ; 

LEXICON NP-COMMON
N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
POSS ;   

LEXICON N1 

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N2

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)

LEXICON N3

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>:%{I%}н KI ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-ACR

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: CLIT ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- CASES-OBL ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OVA

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;  

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;  
NP-COG-OVA ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;  
NP-COG-OVA ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;  

LEXICON NP-COG-M 
! e.g. Толстой

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;  

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASES ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-AL-ACR

%<np%>%<al%>%<acr%>%<nom%>: CLIT ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<acr%>:%- CASES-OBL ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<acr%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

! TODO: Comparison
!%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к # ; 

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}н CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}нъ CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1 

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ; 
!%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>нъ CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>к CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}нъ%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%}%>л%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-VOL

! FIXME: Check these
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>нъ CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>нъ%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%{I%} CLIT ;

LEXICON V-FIN-REG-NEG

%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON V-FIN-IRREG-NEG

%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-AOR ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}й V-PERS-AOR ; ! FIXME

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-NONFIN-IRREG-NEG 

%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} V-PERS-VOL ; ! FIXME

%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>й CLIT ;

%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>й CLIT ;

LEXICON Nouns
алд:алд N3 ; ! ""
клуб:клуб N1 ; ! "клуб"
киси:киси N1 ; ! "человек"
эл:эл N1 ; ! ""
аьлим:аьлим N1 ; ! ""
хайыр:хайыр N1 ; ! ""
увыл:ул N1 ; ! "сын" Dir/LR
коьк:коьк N1 ; ! "небо"
мал:мал N1 ; ! ""
йылан:йылан N1 ; ! ""
тап:тап N1 ; ! "пядь"
техника:техника N1 ; ! ""
служба:служба N1 ; ! ""
бийсемби:бийсемби N1 ; ! "четверг"
юма% эртеси:юма% эрте N2 ; ! "суббота"
куьн% аьли:куьн% аьль N2 ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Россия:Россия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Санкт%-Петербург:Санкт%-Петербург NP-TOP ; ! ""
Кавказ:Кавказ NP-TOP ; ! ""
Осетия:Осетия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Мордовия:Мордовия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Тюмень:Тюмень NP-TOP ; ! ""
Кабардино%-Балкария:Кабардино%-Балкария NP-TOP ; ! ""
Сухокумск:Сухокумск NP-TOP ; ! ""
Астрахань:Астрахань NP-TOP ; ! ""
Краснодар:Краснодар NP-TOP ; ! ""
Куьнбатар:Куьнбатар NP-TOP ; ! ""
Рига:Рига NP-TOP ; ! ""
Чуваш% Республика:Чуваш% Республика NP-TOP ; ! "" FIXME
ДР:ДР NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
РФ:РФ NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
РСФСР:РСФСР NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
ЧИАССР:ЧИАССР NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
СССР:СССР NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
Юрий:Юрий NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Владимир:Владимир NP-ANT-M; ! ""
Хосе:Хосе NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Гамзат:Гамзат NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Алимхан:Алимхан NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Магомет%-Али:Магомет%-Али NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Алимет:Алимет NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Мурзабек:Мурзабек NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Иса:Иса NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Махмуд:Махмуд NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Абай:Абай NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Николай:Николай NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Омар:Омар NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Катя:Катя NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ольга:Ольга NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Танья:Танья NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Наталья:Наталья NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Гульфира:Гульфира NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Яна:Яна NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Антонина:Антонина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Людмила:Людмила NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Нина:Нина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Джамиля:Джамиля NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Клара:Клара NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Асыл:Асыл NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Лашын:Лашын NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Геннадиевич:Геннадиевич NP-COG-MF ; ! "" FIXME
Орбекеевич:Орбекеевич NP-COG-MF ; ! "" FIXME
Шамсудинович:Шамсудинович NP-COG-MF ; ! "" FIXME
Апасович:Апасович NP-COG-MF ; ! "" FIXME
Гоголь:Гоголь NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Толстой:Толстой NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Толик:Толик NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Архипов:Архипов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Пушкин:Пушкин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Маркс:Маркс NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Медведев:Медведев NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Путин:Путин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ленин:Ленин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Хлопонин:Хлопонин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Абдулаев:Абдулаев NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Сикалиев:Сикалиев NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Бекмуратов:Бекмуратов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Газимагомедов:Газимагомедов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Башантавов:Башантавов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Кулунчаков:Кулунчаков NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Гаджиев:Гаджиев NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Кидирниязов:Кидирниязов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Рахмедов:Рахмедов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Шихсаидов:Шихсаидов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Газимагомедов:Газимагомедов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Единая% Россия:Единая% Россия NP-AL ; ! ""
Шоьл% тавысы:Шоьл% тавысы NP-AL ; ! ""
Ногайский% район:Ногайский% район NP-AL ; ! ""
СКФО:СКФО NP-AL-ACR ; ! "Северо-Кавказский федеральный округ"
СП% МО:СП% МО NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
КПРФ:КПРФ NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
РОВД:РОВД NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
УО:УО NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
ОВД:ОВД NP-AL-ACR ; ! "Организация Варшавского договора"
МР% MO:МР% MO NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
МО% MР:МО% MР NP-AL-ACR ; ! "Муниципальное образование муниципального района"
МР:МР NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
МО:МО NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
СМИ:СМИ NP-AL-ACR ; ! "" FIXME
КПРД:КПРД NP-AL-ACR ; ! ""
Червленные% Буруны:Червленные% Буруны NP-AL ; ! ""
Червленные% Буруны:Червленные%-Буруны NP-AL ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
LEXICON Adjectives
йок:йок A3 ; ! ""
бар:бар A3 ; ! ""
тувыл:тувыл A3 ; ! "" FIXME
кызыл:кызыл A1 ; ! "красный"
ток:ток A1 ; ! "сытый"
тыныш:тыныш A1 ; ! "мирный"
яман:яман A1 ; ! "плохой"
орта:орта A1 ; ! "посредственный" FIXME
ийги:ийги A1 ; ! ""
толы:толы A1 ; ! ""
юзли:юзли A1 ; ! ""
тоьмен:тоьмен A1 ; ! ""
уллы:уллы A1 ; ! "великий, большой"
бос:бос A1 ; ! ""
каты:каты A1 ; ! "твёрдый"
ак:ак A1 ; ! "белый"
косымша:косымша A3 ; ! ""
социаллык:социаллык A4 ; ! ""
савлайроссиялык:савлайроссиялык A4 ; ! ""	
террористлик:террористлик A4 ; ! ""
информациялык:информациялык A4 ; ! ""
техникалык:техникалык A4 ; ! ""
общий:общий A4 ; ! ""
целевой:целевой A4 ; ! ""
орынлы:орынлы A4 ; ! ""
савлай:савлай A4 ; ! ""
миллетли:миллетли A4 ; ! ""
яваплы:яваплы  A4 ; ! ""
бай:бай A4 ; ! ""
